Georgia, session 2025_26, HB634.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 33 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the "Georgia
Special Needs Scholarship Act," is amended by revising subsections (a) and (f) of Code
Section 20-2-2116, relating to amount of scholarship and method of payments, as follows:
"(a) The maximum scholarship granted a scholarship student pursuant to this article shall
be an amount equivalent to the costs of the educational program that would have been
provided for the student in the resident school system as calculated under Code
Section 20-2-161 and, if a scholarship student has an Individualized Education Program
H. B. 634
- 1 -

LC 49 2285
(IEP), based upon services specified in the Individualized Education Program in place at
the time of the most recent enrollment count, as described in Code Section 20-2-160.;
provided, however, that, in the case of a student whose first Individual Education Program
was expedited as provided for in subparagraph (a)(3)(A) of Code Section 20-2-2114 but
was not in effect at the time of the most recent enrollment count, the initial calculation of
the maximum scholarship amount shall be based upon services specified in the
Individualized Education Program in place at the time such Individualized Education
Program takes effect; and provided, further, that such initial calculation shall be revised
based upon services specified in the Individualized Education Program in place at the time
of the next enrollment count. This shall not include any federal funds."
"(f) Payment to the parents must shall be made by individual warrant made payable to the
student's parent. The department shall electronically deposit payments that have been
restrictively endorsed by parents into the account of such school; provided, however, that
in the event an electronic deposit cannot be made, such payment may be and mailed by the
department to the participating school of the parent's choice, and the parent shall
restrictively endorse the warrant to the participating school for deposit into the account of
such school."
SECTION 2.
Said article is further amended by revising subsections (a) and (b) of Code
Section 20-2-2117, relating to adoption and promulgation of rules, immunity from liability
for scholarship decisions, and schools may be barred from program participation for certain
actions, as follows:
"(a) The board shall adopt rules to administer the program regarding student eligibility,
eligibility and participation of participating schools, including, but not limited to, timelines
that will maximize student and public and private school participation, the calculation and
distribution of scholarships to eligible students and participating schools, and the
H. B. 634
- 2 -

LC 49 2285
application and approval procedures for eligible students and participating schools, the
transparency of the program, and ensuring public awareness of the program and its impacts.
The department shall develop and utilize a compliance form for completion by
participating schools. The department shall be authorized to require any pertinent
information as it deems necessary from participating schools for the purpose of
implementing the program. Participating schools shall be required to complete such forms
and certify their accuracy.
(b)(1) The board shall adopt rules to administer the program regarding student eligibility,
transparency, and awareness of the impact of the program., including, but not limited to,
the following: The department shall develop and utilize a compliance form for
completion by participating schools. The department shall be authorized to require any
pertinent information as it deems necessary from participating schools for the purpose of
implementing the program. Participating schools shall be required to complete such
forms and certify the accuracy of the information contained therein.
(1)(2) The department shall conduct an annual survey of participating parents'
satisfaction with the program, their satisfaction with the private school, and their
likelihood of recommending the program. Survey results shall be collected using only
numerical measures and made publicly available in the annual report provided for in
Code Section 20-2-2118; and.
(2)(3) The department shall post on its publicly accessible public website the basic unit
cost for general instructional programs as a minimum estimate for scholarship amounts.
Within 30 days of the final enrollment count each school year provided for in
subsection (a) of Code Section 20-2-160 and the adoption by the General Assembly of
an appropriations Act in which funding for this article is provided, the department shall
provide the parents of scholarship students estimated scholarship amounts. Each year,
as soon as practicable but no later than July 15, the The department shall provide parents
of scholarship students the actual scholarship amounts upon appropriation of state funds
H. B. 634
- 3 -

LC 49 2285
to the department for disbursement. Within 30 calendar days of receipt of the actual
scholarship amount, a parent of a scholarship student who believes that such student's
program weights have been incorrectly reported by the local school system, including,
but not limited to, services or segments that are included in the student's Individualized
Education Program but were not recorded as part of such final enrollment count, may
make a request in writing to the department for a review of the accuracy of the local
school system's reported program weights. The department shall provide a written
response within 30 days of receipt of the parent's written request."
SECTION 3.
Said article is further amended by revising Code Section 20-2-2118, relating to annual report,
as follows:
"20-2-2118.
The Office of Student Achievement, in conjunction with the department, shall provide the
General Assembly not later than December 1 of each year with a report regarding the
scholarship program for the previous fiscal year. The report shall include, but not be
limited to, numbers and demographics of students participating, disaggregated by student
age, grade level, gender, race, ethnicity, and eligibility for free or reduced price meals
under federal guidelines at the time each student commenced participating in the program;
and numbers of participating schools; and the medical or behavioral conditions the
participating school is either currently accommodating or is able to accommodate. Such
report shall also be posted on the Office of Student Achievement's public website."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 634
- 4 -